Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2455.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1321(a) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 amended to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 1321(A), (C), (H), (I) AND (K) OF THE ACT OF APRIL 9, 1929 (P.L.177, NO.175), KNOWN AS THE ADMINISTRATIVE CODE OF 1929, ARE AMENDED TO READ:Section 1321. Collective Bargaining.--(a) School administrators employed by a city of the first class or employed by a school district of the first class A shall, through labor organizations or other representatives designated by fifty per centum (50%) or more of such school administrators, have the right to bargain collectively with their public employers concerning the terms and conditions of their employment, including compensation, hours, working conditions, retirement, pension and other benefits, and shall have the right to an adjustment or settlement of their grievances or disputes in accordance with the terms of this section. The Pennsylvania Labor Relations Board shall resolve disputes as to the items under this subsection in the same manner as it resolves disputes under the act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, No.195), known as the "Public Employe Relations Act."* * *(C) COLLECTIVE BARGAINING SHALL BEGIN AT LEAST SIX MONTHS BEFORE THE START OF THE FISCAL YEAR OF CITIES OF THE FIRST CLASS OR SCHOOL DISTRICTS OF THE FIRST CLASS A, AND ANY REQUEST FOR ARBITRATION, AS PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION, SHALL BE MADE AT LEAST ONE HUNDRED TEN (110) DAYS BEFORE THE START OF THE FISCAL YEAR.* * *(H) THE DETERMINATION OF THE MAJORITY OF THE BOARD OF ARBITRATION THUS ESTABLISHED SHALL BE FINAL ON THE ISSUE OR ISSUES IN DISPUTE AND SHALL BE BINDING UPON THE PUBLIC EMPLOYER AND THE SCHOOL ADMINISTRATORS INVOLVED. THE DETERMINATION SHALL 20260HB2455PN3558 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 BE IN WRITING, AND A COPY THEREOF SHALL BE FORWARDED TO BOTH PARTIES TO THE DISPUTE. NO APPEAL THEREFROM SHALL BE ALLOWED TO ANY COURT. THE DETERMINATION SHALL CONSTITUTE A MANDATE TO THE SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS IN CITIES OF THE FIRST CLASS OR SCHOOL DISTRICTS OF THE FIRST CLASS A, WITH RESPECT TO MATTERS WHICH CAN BE REMEDIED BY ADMINISTRATIVE ACTION, TO TAKE THE ACTION NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THE DETERMINATION OF THE BOARD OF ARBITRATION.(I) THE COMPENSATION, IF ANY, OF THE ARBITRATOR APPOINTED BY THE SCHOOL ADMINISTRATORS SHALL BE PAID BY THEM. THE COMPENSATION OF THE OTHER TWO ARBITRATORS, AS WELL AS STENOGRAPHIC AND OTHER EXPENSES INCURRED BY THE ARBITRATION PANEL IN CONNECTION WITH THE ARBITRATION PROCEEDINGS, SHALL BE PAID BY THE SCHOOL DISTRICT IN CITIES OF THE FIRST CLASS OR SCHOOL DISTRICTS OF THE FIRST CLASS A.* * *(K) THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE APPLICABLE TO CITIES OF THE FIRST CLASS AND SCHOOL DISTRICTS OF THE FIRST CLASS A, NOTWITHSTANDING THE FACT THAT SUCH CITIES OF THE FIRST CLASS OR SCHOOL DISTRICTS OF THE FIRST CLASS A, EITHER BEFORE OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION, HAVE ADOPTED OR ADOPT A HOME RULE CHARTER.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2455PN3558 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324